Utah statutes.
38-1a-803.   Cancellation of preconstruction or construction lien -- Penalty for failure to cancel timely.

(1)  After the full amount owing under a preconstruction or construction lien, including costs and cancellation fees, has been paid, a person interested in the property that is the subject of the lien may request the claimant to submit for recording with the office of each applicable county recorder a cancellation of the lien.

(2)  Within 10 days after receiving a request under Subsection (1), the claimant shall submit to the office of each applicable county recorder a cancellation of the preconstruction or construction lien, as applicable.

(3)  A claimant who fails to submit a cancellation within the time prescribed in Subsection (2) is liable to the person who requested the cancellation for $100 for each day after the time prescribed in Subsection (2) that the cancellation is not submitted, or the person's actual damages, whichever is greater.

